New York, session 2025-2026, S8006.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 2 county of Dutchess, a participating employer in the New York state and 3 local retirement system that elected to make the twenty-five year 4 retirement plan provided in section 551 of the retirement and social 5 security law available to deputy sheriffs employed by the county of 6 Dutchess is hereby authorized to make such plan available to certain 7 deputy sheriffs who, for reasons not ascribable to their own negligence, 8 failed to make a timely application to participate in such twenty-five 9 year retirement plan. Such employees are Arthur Hart with a start date 10 of November 30, 1998, Stephen J Reverri Jr. with a start date of May 7, 11 2001, Robert M Freer II with a start date of November 5, 2001, Phillip 12 Lemere with a start date of December 3, 2001, Corey Ritch with a start 13 date of February 7, 2004, Dawn Bonds with a start date of February 9, 14 2004, Brian Wilber with a start date of October 12, 2004, Joel R Petrus 15 with a start date of July 11, 2005, Stephen Slattery with a start date 16 of July 11, 2005, Dominick Marcello with a start date of September 23, 17 2006, Ryan Griffin with a start date of May 7, 2007, Adam Harris with a 18 start date of May 7, 2007, Kate Capalbo with a start date of April 11, 19 2009, Jared T Griffin with a start date of May 9, 2009, Jeffrey Cohen 20 with a start date of March 31, 2012, Adrienne Licari with a start date EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11927-07-6 S. 8006--A 2 1 of July 2, 2012, William Butler with a start date of April 1, 2013, 2 Christopher Sheridan with a start date of October 21, 2013, Paul Digiov- 3 anni with a start date of April 28, 2014, Justin Hogan with a start date 4 of June 8, 2015, James Flanagan with a start date of February 29, 2016, 5 Kyle Esposito with a start date of September 19, 2016, Paul Reinheimer 6 with a start date of October 11, 2016, Christian Robillard with a start 7 date of May 1, 2017, Ryan Duval with a start date of January 2, 2018, 8 Scott Haire with a start date of April 15, 2019, Timothy Stabell with a 9 start date of April 15, 2019, Michael Henry with a start date of May 16, 10 2019, Seth Thomas with a start date of February 24, 2020, Carl Short 11 with a start date of March 2, 2020, Brendan Harriott with a start date 12 of April 13, 2020, Amber Perrotta with a start date of October 5, 2020, 13 Ashley Stroka with a start date of March 22, 2021, Travis Beyea with a 14 start date of September 7, 2021, John Andersen with a start date of 15 March 21, 2022, Crystal Burnett with a start date of May 23, 2022, 16 Matthew Stafford with a start date of May 23, 2022, Philip Vallone with 17 a start date of May 23, 2022, Gabrielle Rocco with a start date of June 18 6, 2022, Hosanna Santo with a start date of June 27, 2022, Connor Carey 19 with a start date of July 5, 2022, D'Andre Barr with a start date of 20 February 27, 2023, Ryan Kozlowski with a start date of February 27, 21 2023, Dylan Merritt with a start date of August 28, 2023, Emily Abbatan- 22 tuono with a start date of August 28, 2023, John Carney with a start 23 date of December 30, 2023, Brian Santiago with a start date of January 24 16, 2024, Raymond Sherrer with a start date of March 4, 2024, Cody 25 Carufe with a start date of June 10, 2024 and Marcus Crixus with a start 26 date of August 12, 2024. The county of Dutchess may so elect by filing 27 with the state comptroller, on or before one hundred eighty days after 28 this act shall have become law, a resolution of its governing body 29 together with certification that such deputy sheriffs did not bar them- 30 selves from participating in the twenty-five year retirement plan 31 provided in section 551 of the retirement and social security law as a 32 result of their own negligence. Thereafter, such deputy sheriffs may 33 individually elect to be covered by the provisions of the twenty-five 34 year retirement plan provided in section 551 of the retirement and 35 social security law, and shall be entitled to the full rights and bene- 36 fits associated with coverage under such section, by filing an election 37 with the New York state and local retirement system within one year of 38 the effective date of this act. 39 § 2. To the extent practicable, the county of Dutchess shall provide a 40 link to an electronic version of the election form that can be down- 41 loaded and shall assist with outreach to ensure that the members have 42 been notified of their election option. 43 § 3. All employer past service costs associated with implementing the 44 provisions of this act shall be borne by the county of Dutchess and may 45 be amortized over a five-year period. 46 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would allow Dutchess county to reopen the provisions of Article 14-B of the Retirement and Social Security Law (RSSL) to all individuals named therein. We estimate that Dutchess county's annual contributions will increase $210,000 beginning FYE 2027. Annual costs will vary but are expected to average 2.7% of salary. In addition, there will be an immediate past service cost of $174,000 borne by Dutchess county as a one-time payment. This cost assumes that S. 8006--A 3 payment will be made on February 1, 2027. If Dutchess county elects to amortize this cost over 5 years, the cost for each year will be $38,800. These estimated costs are based on 50 affected members employed by Dutchess county, with annual salary of approximately $5.4 million as of March 31, 2025. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated January 27, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-25. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actu- aries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.